Maine, session 132, LD1396.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §4401, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2023, c. 79, §1, is further
amended to read:
4. Subdivision. "Subdivision" means the division of a tract or parcel of land into 3 5
or more lots within any 5-year period that begins on or after September 23, 1971. This
definition applies whether the division is accomplished by sale, lease, development,
buildings or otherwise. The term "subdivision" also includes the division of a new structure
or structures on a tract or parcel of land into 3 5 or more dwelling units within a 5-year
period, the construction or placement of 3 5 or more dwelling units on a single tract or
parcel of land and the division of an existing structure or structures previously used for
commercial or industrial use into 3 5 or more dwelling units within a 5-year period.
A. In determining whether a tract or parcel of land is divided into 3 5 or more lots, the
first dividing 3 dividings of the tract or parcel is are considered to create the first 2 4
lots and the next dividing of either any of these first 2 4 lots, by whomever
accomplished, is considered to create a 3rd 5th lot, unless:
(1) Both dividings are accomplished by a subdivider who has retained one of the
lots for the subdivider's own use as a single-family residence that has been the
subdivider's principal residence for a period of at least 5 years immediately
preceding the 2nd division; or
(2) The division of the tract or parcel is otherwise exempt under this subchapter,
including a division of land or creation of a unit or lot that does not meet the
definition of "subdivision" in this subsection.
B. The dividing of a tract or parcel of land and the lot or lots so made, which if the
dividing or lots when made are not subject to this subchapter, do not become subject
to this subchapter by the subsequent dividing of that tract or parcel of land or any
portion of that tract or parcel. The municipal reviewing authority shall consider the
existence of the previously created lot or lots in reviewing a proposed subdivision
created by a subsequent dividing.
C. A lot of 40 or more acres must be counted as a lot, except:
(2) When a municipality has, by ordinance, or the municipal reviewing authority
has, by regulation, elected not to count lots of 40 or more acres as lots for the
purposes of this subchapter when the parcel of land being divided is located
entirely outside any shoreland area as defined in Title 38, section 435 or a
municipality's shoreland zoning ordinance.
D-1. A division accomplished by devise does not create a lot or lots for the purposes
of this definition, unless the intent of the transferor is to avoid the objectives of this
subchapter or other applicable municipal requirements including road or safety
standards.
D-2. A division accomplished by condemnation does not create a lot or lots for the
purposes of this definition, unless the intent of the transferor is to avoid the objectives
of this subchapter.
Page 1 - 132LR1646(01)

D-3. A division accomplished by order of court does not create a lot or lots for the
purposes of this definition, unless the intent of the transferor is to avoid the objectives
of this subchapter.
D-4. A division accomplished by gift to a person related to the donor of an interest in
property held by the donor for a continuous period of 5 years prior to the division by
gift does not create a lot or lots for the purposes of this definition, unless the intent of
the transferor is to avoid the objectives of this subchapter. If the real estate exempt
under this paragraph is transferred within 5 years to another person not related to the
donor of the exempt real estate as provided in this paragraph, then the previously
exempt division creates a lot or lots for the purposes of this subsection. "Person related
to the donor" means a spouse, parent, grandparent, brother, sister, child or grandchild
related by blood, marriage or adoption. A gift under this paragraph can not cannot be
given for consideration that is more than 1/2 the assessed value of the real estate.
D-5. A division accomplished by a gift to a municipality if that municipality accepts
the gift does not create a lot or lots for the purposes of this definition, unless the intent
of the transferor is to avoid the objectives of this subchapter.
D-6. A division accomplished by the transfer of any interest in land to the owners of
land abutting that land by deeds in the form of a boundary adjustment agreement or
reciprocal deeds between the abutting land owners does not create a lot or lots for the
purposes of this definition, unless the intent of the transferor is to avoid the objectives
of this subchapter. If the real estate exempt under this paragraph is transferred within
5 years to another person without all of the merged land, then the previously exempt
division creates a lot or lots for the purposes of this subsection.
D-7. A division accomplished by the creation of an accessory dwelling unit, whether
attached or detached from an existing dwelling unit, does not create a lot for the
purposes of this definition.
E. The division of a tract or parcel of land into 3 5 or more lots and upon each of which
lots permanent dwelling structures legally existed before September 23, 1971 is not a
subdivision.
F. In determining the number of dwelling units in a structure, the provisions of this
subsection regarding the determination of the number of lots apply, including
exemptions from the definition of a subdivision of land.
H-2. This subchapter may not be construed to prevent a municipality from enacting an
ordinance under its home rule authority that otherwise regulates land use activities if
the ordinance does not conflict with this section or prevent the creation of a housing
unit by defining the unit as a lot for purposes of review by a local legislative body,
except in the limited manner prescribed in this subchapter.
A municipality may not enact an ordinance that expands the definition of "subdivision"
except as provided in this subchapter. A municipality that has a definition of
"subdivision" that conflicts with the requirements of this subsection at the time this
paragraph takes effect shall comply with this subsection no later than January 1, 2021
2026. Such a municipality must file its conflicting definition at the county registry of
deeds by June 30, 2020 for the definition to remain valid for the grace period ending
January 1, 2021. A filing required under this paragraph must be collected and indexed
Page 2 - 132LR1646(01)

415 in a separate book in the registry of deeds for the county in which the municipality is
426 located.
I. The grant of a bona fide security interest in an entire lot that has been exempted from
the definition of subdivision under paragraphs D‑1 to D‑6 D-7, or subsequent transfer
of that entire lot by the original holder of the security interest or that person's successor
in interest, does not create a lot for the purposes of this definition, unless the intent of
the transferor is to avoid the objectives of this subchapter. A mortgage, pledge or other
instrument of hypothecation against a dwelling unit or a portion of real property within
a parcel that is otherwise defined by this section as a lot is not a lot for purposes of this
section. For purposes of this paragraph, "hypothecation" means a pledge of collateral
by a debtor to secure a debt or a loan.
J. Unless the intent of a transferor is to avoid the objectives of this subchapter, the
division of a tract or parcel of land accomplished by the transfer of any interest in the
land to a holder does not create a lot or lots for purposes of this definition if:
(1) The transferred interest, as expressed by conservation easement, binding
agreement, declaration of trust or otherwise, is to be permanently held for one or
more of the following conservation purposes:
(a) Retaining or protecting the natural, scenic or open space values of the land;
(b) Ensuring the availability of the land for agricultural, forest, recreational or
open space use;
(c) Protecting natural resources; or
(d) Maintaining or enhancing air quality or water quality; and
(2) The transferred interest is not subsequently further divided or transferred
except to another holder.
As used in this paragraph, "holder" has the same meaning as in Title 33, section 476,
subsection 2.
K. The creation of a dwelling unit or division of land that does not meet the definition
of "subdivision" in this section may not be construed as intent to avoid the objectives
of this chapter if the dwelling unit or division of land otherwise complies with state and
local land use and zoning laws and ordinances as determined by an appropriate officer
of the municipality or unorganized territory in which the dwelling unit or division of
land is located.
Sec. 2. 30-A MRSA §4402, sub-§6, as amended by PL 2019, c. 174, §2, is further
amended to read:
6. Division of new or existing structures. Beginning July 1, 2018, a division of a
new or existing structure into 3 or more dwelling units whether the division is accomplished
by sale, lease, development or otherwise in a municipality where the project is subject to
municipal site plan review. Beginning January 1, 2026, this subchapter does not apply to
the creation of any number of dwelling units within an existing structure, whether by
creating a condominium or through the redevelopment of the interior of the structure or by
any other means, if the project is subject to municipal site plan review and approval.
Page 3 - 132LR1646(01)

A. For the purposes of this subsection, "municipal site plan review" means review
under a municipal ordinance that sets forth a process for determining whether a
development meets certain specified criteria, which must include criteria regarding
stormwater management, sewage disposal, water supply and vehicular access and
which may include criteria regarding other environmental effects, layout, scale,
appearance and safety.
B. The municipal reviewing authority in each municipality shall determine whether a
municipal site plan review ordinance adopted by the municipality meets the
requirements of paragraph A.